Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3015.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 84.027, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 21. new text end new text begin Permit applications; submission to Tribal government. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must submit an application for a permit issued by the commissioner that has a substantial direct effect on a Minnesota Tribal government to the governing body of the affected Tribal government as soon as practicable. If the application is not complete, the commissioner must send any additional information of substance received after the application is submitted to the Tribal government as soon as practicable. new text end new text begin (b) For purposes of this subdivision, "Minnesota Tribal government" has the meaning given in section 10.65, subdivision 2, clause (4). new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 116.03, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Permit applications; submission to Tribal government. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must submit an application for a permit issued by the commissioner that has a substantial direct effect on a Minnesota Tribal government to the governing body of the affected Tribal government as soon as practicable. If the application is not complete, the commissioner must send any additional information of substance received after the application is submitted to the Tribal government as soon as practicable. new text end new text begin (b) For purposes of this subdivision, "Minnesota Tribal government" has the meaning given in section 10.65, subdivision 2, clause (4). new text end